Rhode Island statutes. Title 29 Libraries
Chapter 6 State Aid to Libraries

29-6-1.
Statement of policy.

The general assembly hereby declares it to be the policy of this state:

That free public libraries are essential to the general enlightenment of citizens in a democracy;

That these free public libraries shall provide for the cultural, educational, informational, and research needs of all citizens;

That free public libraries are an integral part of the educational system at all levels and a source for vocational information and continued learning following the period of formal education; and

That it is the responsibility of government at all levels to provide adequate financial support for all free public libraries.

The general assembly further declares it to be the policy of this state to coordinate on a cooperative basis the resources of academic, free public, school, and special libraries to meet the expanding needs of all citizens and that it is the responsibility of government at all levels to provide adequate financial support to coordinate library resources throughout the state for improved library services to all citizens.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

29-6-1

; P.L. 1964, ch. 233, § 3; P.L. 1967, ch. 227, § 5.

29-6-2.
Public library services.

For each city or town, the state’s share to support local public library services shall be equal to at least twenty-five percent (25%) of both the amount appropriated and expended in the second preceding fiscal year by the city or town from local tax revenues and funds from the public library’s private endowment that supplement the municipal appropriation; provided, however, the state in any year shall not be obligated to match any amount from the endowment that exceeds six percent (6%) of the three-year (3) average market value, calculated at the end of the calendar year, of the investments in the endowment. The amount of the grant payable to each municipality in any year in accordance with this section shall be reduced proportionately in the event that the total of those grants in any year exceeds the amount appropriated that year for the purposes of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 196, § 3; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 7, § 3; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 20, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 458, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 520, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 563, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 25, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 191, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 211, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 282, § 2, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 283, § 2, effective July 9, 2021.

29-6-3.
Eligibility requirements — Municipalities.

To qualify for state aid under §

29-6-2

, a city or town shall:

Appropriate from local tax revenues an amount not less than the amount appropriated the previous year from local tax revenues and expended for library operating expenses. The appropriation would exclude any state funds received for public library services. Any funds received from the state shall not be used to supplant funds from local tax revenues;

In the case of a city or town having more than one free public library therein, submit or cause to be submitted to the office of library and information services a plan for the allotment or division of the proposed state aid among the free public libraries in the city or town. The plan shall be developed by agreement among the free public libraries of the city or town;

Submit or cause to be submitted to the office of library and information services evidence that free public libraries in the city or town meet standards of service as set forth in regulations to be made by the chief of library services pursuant to the provisions of chapter 3.1 of this title or that the regulations are inappropriate for that library;

Submit or cause to be submitted a plan describing how the public library or libraries plan to address one or more of the priorities established by the office of library and information services.

The chief of library services upon application and for cause shown may authorize an annual grant-in-aid under §

29-6-2

, or a portion thereof, to a city or town not fully meeting the requirements set forth in subsections (a)(1)-(a)(3).

Decisions as to the eligibility of cities and towns for grants-in-aid under this chapter, and the amounts of the grants-in-aid, shall be made by the chief of library services.

The chief of library services shall require a preservation plan from any public library which receives an appropriation from the state of Rhode Island which states the preservation needs and objectives of the library for the coming fiscal year. The plan shall include, but not be limited to: condition of materials, assessment of building and environmental controls, and preservation measures to be taken.

The chief of library services shall require a disaster preparedness plan from any public library which receives an appropriation from the state of Rhode Island which states the plan of action to be taken in the event of a natural or human made disaster. The plan shall be in accordance with a suggested plan published by the office. The plan shall be updated yearly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 196, § 3; P.L. 1991, ch. 6, art. 19, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 15, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 191, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 211, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 26; P.L. 2021, ch. 282, § 2, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 283, § 2, effective July 9, 2021.

29-6-4.
Library councils.

In cities or towns having more than one free public library, the boards of trustees, or other governing bodies of the libraries in the city or town, may appoint an interlibrary committee to include the principal librarian of each of the libraries and one other representative of each of the libraries, the committee to be known as a “library council”. The library council is hereby authorized to prepare and submit on behalf of a city or town the plan required by the provisions of §

29-6-3

for division of the proposed annual grant-in-aid to the city or town among the free public libraries therein. The library council may also serve as a means for promoting interlibrary cooperation in the city or town, and is authorized to advise the free public libraries therein on all matters relating to cooperative or joint library services, and may make recommendations pertaining thereto.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

29-6-4

; P.L. 1964, ch. 233, § 3.

29-6-5.
Cooperative library services.

Any city or town may enter into an agreement with another city or town, or more than one other, to establish or maintain free public library service, or one or more aspects thereof to citizens therein, and those agreements for cooperative library service shall be valid when approved and accepted by the boards of trustees or other governing bodies of the libraries concerned, and by the respective city or town councils of the cities and towns parties to the agreement, and signed by the appropriate library officers and city or town officials thereunto authorized.

Agreements for cooperative library service may be entered into by, and between, two (2) or more free public libraries, whether or not they are in the same city or town; provided, however, in the case of a free public library established or existing under the provisions of §

29-4-1

, the agreement shall not be valid until it has been approved and accepted by the council of the city or town where the library is located.

These agreements shall be reported to the office of library and information services, and such appropriate and equitable adjustments in annual grants-in-aid under this chapter shall be made as the circumstances may require.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

29-6-5

; P.L. 1964, ch. 233, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 191, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 211, § 2.

29-6-6.
Construction and capital improvements.

The office of library and information services may cause to be paid to a city or town treasurer, or to any free public library in the state, a grant-in-aid for the construction and capital improvement of any free public library as the chief of library services may determine is necessary and desirable to provide better free library services to the public, which shall be paid in accordance with the following provisions:

No grant-in-aid shall be made unless the city or town receiving the grant-in-aid shall cause to be appropriated for the same purpose an amount from its own funds and not from any federal grant or other federal financial assistance equal to, or more than, the state grant-in-aid, or unless funds from private sources are dedicated for the same purpose in an amount equal to, or more than, the state grant-in-aid, or unless the total of the city or town appropriation and the funds from private sources for the same purpose is equal to, or more than, the state grant-in-aid.

The state grant-in-aid may be paid in installments over a period of years up to a maximum of twenty (20) years, beginning in the fiscal year during which the project is accepted by the office of library and information services. Whenever a grant-in-aid is paid on the installment basis permitted herein, there shall be included in the state grant-in-aid the interest cost actually incurred by the city or town, or any free public library, as a result of its having to borrow the state’s portion of the total cost of the library project. The amount of this interest cost shall be computed on the actual interest cost paid by the city or town, or free public library, less any applicable accrued interest, premiums, and profits from investments, over the period of time elapsing between the date borrowed funds are made available and the date of the last installment payment of the state grant-in-aid. Interest cost incurred by the city or town, or any free public library, as a result of having to borrow its portion of the total cost of the library project shall not be considered a part of the total cost of the project for the purposes of matching provided for in subdivision (1) of this section. Nothing contained herein shall prohibit the office of library and information services from accelerating the schedule of annual installments, or from paying the balance due of the state’s grant-in-aid in a lump sum; provided, however, that the state grant-in-aid in any fiscal year shall include no less than one-twentieth ( UNHANDLEDCHAR UNHANDLEDCHAR UNHANDLEDCHAR ) of the state’s total reimbursable principal obligations.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

29-6-6

; P.L. 1964, ch. 233, § 3; P.L. 1966, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 324, § 6; P.L. 2010, ch. 191, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 211, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 12, § 12; P.L. 2021, ch. 282, § 2, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 283, § 2, effective July 9, 2021.

29-6-7.
State supported institutions.

For each state supported residential institution and the school for the deaf, the state’s share under this program to support library services for residents or students shall be gradually increased until the state’s share in fiscal year 2000 is equal to at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount appropriated and expended in the second preceding fiscal year by the institution for operating expenditures to support library services for residents or students.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 196, § 3.

29-6-7.1, 29-6-7.2.
Repealed.

29-6-8.
Eligibility requirements — Institutions.

To qualify for state aid under §

29-6-7

, an institution shall:

Allocate from its appropriation an amount not less than the amount allocated and expended the previous year for operating expenditures to support library services for residents or students; and

Submit, or cause to be submitted, to the office of library and information services evidence that the library or libraries in the institution meet standards of service as set forth in regulations to be made by the chief of library services pursuant to the provisions of chapter 3.1 of this title.

Any funds received from the state under this program shall not be used to supplant funds from other sources.

The chief of library services, upon application and for cause shown, may authorize an annual grant-in-aid under §

29-6-7

, or a portion thereof, to an institution not fully meeting the requirements set forth in subsections (a) and (b) of this section.

Decisions as to the eligibility of institutions for grants-in-aid under this chapter, and the amounts of the grants-in-aid, shall be made by the chief of library services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 196, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 191, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 211, § 2.

29-6-9.
Rhode Island library network.

In order to provide each individual in Rhode Island with equal opportunity of access to resources that will satisfy their and society’s information needs and interests, the office of library and information services is hereby authorized to establish a Rhode Island library network, hereafter referred to as the library of Rhode Island network (LORI), to be administered by the office of library and information services for the purpose of maintaining, promoting, and developing a program of statewide resource sharing and interlibrary cooperation. The office of library and information services shall include, as part of its budget, a budget for the administration and operation of the LORI network to:

Provide central support services for the library of Rhode Island, such as delivery of materials, consultant services, resource sharing, and access to bibliographic and other information sources; and

[Deleted by P.L. 2021, ch. 282, § 2 and P.L. 2021, ch. 283, § 2.]

Support the development, maintenance of, and access to the resource sharing potential embodied in specialized collections and services at the Providence public library and other libraries that can be provided most cost effectively on a statewide basis.

By fiscal year 2000, the state shall provide, from state and federal revenue sources, one hundred percent (100%) of the funding for the following statewide library services:

Reference resource center located in a public library to be chosen by the office of library and information services from responses to a request for proposals issued by the office of library and information services no less than every five (5) years;

Interlibrary delivery system;

[Deleted by P.L. 2021, ch. 282, § 2 and P.L. 2021, ch. 283, § 2.]

Online resource sharing system to facilitate interlibrary loan; and

A single point of access to all holdings of LORI member libraries.

[Deleted by P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 29, § 1.]

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b), the funding for the statewide access to databases shall be subject to appropriation by the general assembly. The duty imposed upon the office of state library and information services to create and maintain a statewide interlibrary delivery and resource sharing system and provide statewide access to databases shall be subject to appropriation by the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 196, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 29, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 264, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 290, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 191, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 211, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 136, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 26; P.L. 2021, ch. 282, § 2, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 283, § 2, effective July 9, 2021.

29-6-10.
Appropriation authorization.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as it may deem necessary for the purpose of carrying into effect the provisions of §§

29-6-2

,

29-6-6

,

29-6-7

, and

29-6-9

; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sums, or so much thereof as may from time to time be required, upon his or her receipt of duly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 196, § 3.

29-6-11.
Severability.

If any provision of §

29-1-1

, or of chapters 3.1, 4, or 6 of this title, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of these provisions, and the application of these provisions to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 233, § 6.

29-6-12.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 144, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 29, § 5, effective July 1, 1996.